Hawaii statutes.
§444-2.5 Owner-builder exemption.
(a) This chapter shall not apply to owners or lessees of property who build or
improve residential or farm buildings or structures on property for their own
use, or for use by their grandparents, parents, siblings, or children, and who
do not offer the buildings or structures for sale or lease; provided that:

(1) To qualify for an exemption under this section,
the owner or lessee shall register for the exemption as provided in section
444-9.1;

(2) The exemption under this section shall not apply
to electrical or plumbing work that must be performed only by persons or
entities licensed in accordance with this chapter, unless the owner or lessee
of the property is licensed for such work under chapter 448E;

(3) An owner or lessee exempted under this section
shall:

(A) Supervise the construction activity on
the exempt buildings or structures;

(B) Hire subcontractors appropriately
licensed under this chapter to perform any part of the construction activity
for which a license is required;

(C) Ensure that any electrical or plumbing
work is performed by persons and entities appropriately licensed under this
chapter or chapter 448E;

(D) Deduct Federal Insurance Contributions
Act and withholding taxes and provide workers' compensation insurance for
persons working on the construction activity who are not licensed under this
chapter or chapter 448E and who shall be considered employees of the owner or
lessee; and

(E) Ensure that the construction activity
complies with all applicable laws, ordinances, building codes, and zoning
regulations;

(4) Until completion of the construction activity, an
owner or lessee exempted under this section shall make available the following
records for immediate inspection upon request by the department:

(A) A copy of the building permit
application;

(B) A copy of the issued building permit;

(C) Copies of all contracts with the names of
all persons who performed or are performing work on the exempt buildings and
structures; and

(D) Proof of payment to all persons
contracted to work on the exempt buildings and structures; and

(5) Upon completion of the construction activity, an
owner or lessee exempted under this section shall keep and maintain the records
identified in paragraph (4) for a period of three years from completion of the
construction activity and shall make the records available for inspection
within seven business days upon request by the department.

(b) Proof of the sale or lease, or offering
for sale or lease, of the structure within one year after completion shall be
prima facie evidence that the construction or improvement of the structure was
undertaken for the purpose of sale or lease; provided that this subsection
shall not apply to:

(1) Residential properties sold or leased to
employees of the owner or lessee;

(2) Construction or improvements performed pursuant
to an approved building permit where the estimated valuation of work to be
performed, as reflected in the building permit, is less than $10,000; or

(3) Any sale or lease caused by an eligible
unforeseen hardship as determined by the board pursuant to subsection (c).

(c) The board shall determine the eligibility
of an unforeseen hardship claimed by an owner under subsection (b); provided
that an alleged unforeseen hardship shall not be deemed eligible if the board
determines that the construction or improvement of the structure was undertaken
for the purpose of sale or lease. An exemption for an unforeseen hardship
shall not be denied solely because of lack of completion, as the term is
defined in subsection (e). An owner seeking a determination of eligibility of
an unforeseen hardship shall:

(1) Be in compliance with the requirements set forth
in the disclosure statement required to be provided under section 444-9.1; and

(2) Submit a written application to the board at any
time prior to selling, leasing, or offering to sell or lease the property
describing the nature of the applicant's unforeseen hardship. The application
shall include supporting documentation detailing the hardship, such as:

(A) Evidence of receipt of unemployment
compensation;

(B) Tax returns;

(C) Medical records;

(D) Bank statements;

(E) Divorce decrees ordering sale of
property;

(F) Mortgage default letters; or

(G) Bankruptcy filings.

The board shall communicate its determination to the
owner in writing within ninety days of receiving a completed application under
this subsection.

(d) Any owner or lessee of property found to
have violated this section shall not be permitted to engage in any activities
pursuant to this section or to register under section 444-9.1 for a period of
three years. There is a rebuttable presumption that an owner or lessee has
violated this section when the owner or lessee obtains an exemption from the
licensing requirements of section 444-9 more than once in two years.

(e) For the purposes of this section,
"completion" means the date of final inspection approval by the
county.

(f) An owner or lessee exempted under this
section shall not be eligible to recover from the contractors recovery fund.

(g) This section shall not apply to
agricultural buildings, structures, or appurtenances thereto that do not
require a building permit or are exempt from the building code. [L 2010, c 44, §2;
am L 2011, c 115, §1; am L 2013, c 176, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next